Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-2505
Liability.

If a veterinarian assists an animal welfare organization in obtaining euthanizing drugs pursuant to a collaborating veterinarian agreement authorized by the Controlled Substances Animal Welfare Act, such veterinarian is not liable for any acts or omissions on the part of the animal welfare organization, except that disciplinary action may be taken against the separate registration pursuant to section 28-409. The animal welfare organization is liable under the Uniform Controlled Substances Act for acts or omissions on the part of its staff members.

Laws 1999, LB 573, § 5.

Uniform Controlled Substances Act, see section 28-401.01.